zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 五金配件 > 钩子、锁扣与紧固件: 接链环/链节; 金属芯扎带/捆绑带; 吊钩、夹具与卸扣; 调节扣
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de equipamento > Ganchos, fivelas e fixadores: Conetores e ligações de corrente; Atilhos de equipamento; Ganchos, grampos e manilhas de elevação; Fivelas utilitárias
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferragens > Ganchos, fivelas e prendedores: Conectores de correntes; Abraçadeiras; Ganchos, braçadeiras e correntes; Fivelas
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện phần cứng > Móc, vòng kẹp & mỏ cặp xiết: Đầu nối & Khớp nối xích; Dây buộc có lõi thép; Móc, kẹp & vòng kẹp; Khóa đa năng
sk-SK: Náradie > Príslušenstvo ku kovaniu > Háčiky, spony a spinky: Reťazové konektory a články; Popruhy; Zdvíhacie háky, svorky a strmene; Univerzálne spony
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do sprzętu > Haki, klamry i łączniki: Spinki i ogniwa łańcuchów; Opaski uniwersalne; Haki do podnoszenia, zaciski i szekle; Praktyczne klamry
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Techninės įrangos priedai > Kabliukai, sagtys ir tvirtinimo detalės: Grandinių jungtys ir grandys; Plastikiniai raišteliai; Kėlimo kabliai, spaustukai ir jungės; Darbinės sagtys
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Bauzubehör > Haken, Schnallen & Verschlüsse: Kettenverbinder & -glieder; Gear Tie-Universalkabelbinder; Lasthaken, Trageklemmen & Schäkel; Schnallen- & Steckschnallen
ko: 철물 > 철물 부대용품 > 후크/버클/조임기구: 사슬 연결기/고리; 기어 타이; 리프팅 후크/죔쇠/걸쇠; 다용도 버클
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires de quincaillerie > Crochets, boucles et attaches: Maillons et mailles d’accouplement pour chaînes; Attaches flexibles; Crochets de levage, pinces et manilles; Attaches industrielles
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Kutilství a řemeslo – příslušenství > Háčky, spony a spojky: Řetězová oka a spojky; Vázací dráty; Zvedací háky, svorky a spony; Přezky a spony
zh-TW: 硬體 > 硬體配件 > 鐵鉤/扣件: 鎖鏈連接器; 橡膠繩束; 吊鉤/吊夾/連結環; 扣環
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ตะขอ ห่วง และที่ยึด: โซ่และข้อต่อ; ที่มัดอุปกรณ์; ตะขอ แคลมป์จับ และโซ่สำหรับการยก; หัวสายรัด
hr-HR: Željezarija > Metalni dodaci > Kuke, kopče i zatvarači: Spojnice i karike za lanac; Vezice za zupčanike; Kuke za podizanje, stezaljke i okovi; Pomoćne kopče
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori ferramenta > Cerniere, ganci e fibbie: Maglie e connettori per catene; Fascette varie; Ganci di sollevamento, morsetti e moschettoni; Fibbie per usi pratici
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для оборудования и технических изделий > Крюки, пряжки и фиксаторы: Соединители и звенья цепей; Многоразовые стяжки; Подъемные крюки, захваты и скобы; Хозяйственные пряжки
da: Isenkram > Isenkram – tilbehør > Kroge, spænder og befæstelseselementer: Kædeled; Gear Ties; Løftekroge, bøjler og sjækler; Spænder
tr: Hırdavat > Tesisat Aksesuarları > Kancalar, Tokalar ve Sabitleyiciler: Zincir Ara Parçaları ve Bağlantıları; Eşya Bağları; Kaldırma Kancaları, Kelepçeleri ve Prangaları; Kayış Tokaları
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ υλικού > Γάντζοι, πόρπες & συνδετήρες: Συνδετήρες & κρίκοι αλυσίδας; Δεματικά με σύρμα; Ανυψωτικοί γάντζοι, σφιγκτήρες & κρίκοι; Βοηθητικές και πρακτικές πόρπες
fi: Rakentaminen > Tarvikkeet > Koukut, salvat ja haat: Ketjun pikalukot; Tarvikenarut; Nostokoukut, kiristimet ja sakkelit; Salvat
en: Hardware > Hardware Accessories > Hooks, Buckles & Fasteners: Chain Connectors & Links; Gear Ties; Lifting Hooks, Clamps & Shackles; Utility Buckles
hu: Hardver > Hardverkiegészítők > Horgok, csatok és rögzítők: Lánccsatlakozók és láncszemek; Kötöző drótok; Emelő horgok, bilincsek és béklyók; Segédcsatok
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za gradbeno opremo > Kljuke, zaponke in pritrdilni elementi: Verižni priključki in členi; Vezice; Kavlji, sponke in kljuke za dvigovanje; Industrijske zaponke
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Bouwbeslag > Haken, spanbanden en bevestigingsmateriaal: Kettingschakels; Allesbinders; Hijsogen, -klemmen en -haken; Veiligheidsgespen
sv: Metallprodukter > Tillbehör till järnvaror > Krokar, spännen och fästen: Kedjelås och -länkar; Fästband; Lyftkrokar, klämmor och schacklar; Spännen
bg-BG: Железария > Обков и аксесоари > Кукички, катарами и закопчалки: Съединители и връзки за вериги; Универсални телени връзки; Повдигащи куки, скоби и шекели; Катарами
nb: Maskinvare > Tilbehør til materiell > Kroker, spenner og festemidler: Kjettingkoblinger og -lenker; Gear Tie; Løftekroker, klemmer og sjakler; Løftebelter
ja: DIY用品 > DIY小物類 > フック・バックル: チェーン接続用具・ジョイント; ギアータイ; 吊りフック・クランプ; バックル類
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii de feronerie > Cârlige, catarame și elemente de fixare: Elemente de legătură și zale de lanț; Legături; Cârlige de ridicare, cleme și brățări; Catarame utilitare
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios de bricolaje > Ganchos, hebillas y cierres: Eslabones y conectores de cadenas; Bridas de sujeción; Ganchos de grúa, abrazaderas y grilletes; Hebillas para cinturones de herramientas